North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.
§ 122C-282.
Special emergency procedure for violent individuals.

When an individual subject to commitment under the provisions of this Part is also violent and requires restraint and when delay in taking the individual to a commitment examiner for examination would likely endanger life or property, a law enforcement officer may take the person into custody and take him or her immediately before a magistrate or clerk. The law enforcement officer shall execute the affidavit required by

G.S. 122C-281

and in addition shall swear that the respondent is violent and requires restraint and that delay in taking the respondent to a commitment examiner for an examination would endanger life or property.

If the clerk or magistrate finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the facts stated in the affidavit are true, that the respondent is in fact violent and requires restraint, and that delay in taking the respondent to a commitment examiner for an examination would endanger life or property, the clerk or magistrate shall order the law enforcement officer to take the respondent directly to a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

.

Respondents received at a 24-hour facility under the provisions of this section shall be examined and processed thereafter in the same way as all other respondents under this Part.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 33.

Temporary Waiver of Certain Mental Health Commitment Requirements.

Session Laws
2003-178, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2006-66, s. 10.27, Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(a), Session Laws
2009-340, s. 3, Session Laws
2010-119, s. 1, and Session Laws
2010-123, s. 4.8, effective July 1, 2003, and expiring October 1, 2012, provides: “The Secretary of Health and Human Services may, upon request of an LME, waive temporarily the requirements of

G.S. 122C-261

through

G.S. 122C-263

and

G.S. 122C-281

through

G.S. 122C-283

pertaining to initial (first-level) examinations by a physician or eligible psychologist of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261

(a) or

G.S. 122C-281

(a), as applicable, as follows:

“(1) The Secretary has received a request from an LME to substitute for a physician or eligible psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a masters level psychiatric nurse, or a masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist to conduct the initial (first-level) examinations of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261(a)

or
G.S. 122C-281(a). The waiver shall be implemented on a pilot-program basis. The request from the LME shall specifically describe:

“a. How the purpose of the statutory requirement would be better served by waiving the requirement and substituting the proposed change under the waiver.

“b. How the waiver will enable the LME to improve the delivery or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“c. How the services to be provided by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under the waiver are within each of these professional’s scope of practice.

“d. How the health, safety, and welfare of individuals will continue to be at least as well protected under the waiver as under the statutory requirement.

“(2) The Secretary shall review the request and may approve it upon finding that:

“a. The request meets the requirements of this section.

“b. The request furthers the purposes of State policy under

G.S. 122C-2

and mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services reform.

“c. The request improves the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in the counties affected by the waiver and also protects the health, safety, and welfare of individuals receiving these services.

“d. The duties and responsibilities performed by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist are within the individual’s scope of practice.

“(3) The Secretary shall evaluate the effectiveness, quality, and efficiency of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and protection of health, safety, and welfare under the waiver. The Secretary shall send a report on the evaluation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substances Abuse Services by October 1, 2009. The report shall include data gathered from all participating LMEs since the beginning of the pilot.

“(4) The waiver granted by the Secretary under this section shall be in effect until October 1, 2012.

“(5) The Secretary may grant a waiver under this section to up to 20 LMEs.

“(6) In no event shall the substitution of a licensed clinical social worker, masters level psychiatric nurse, or masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under a waiver granted under this section be construed as authorization to expand the scope of practice of the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist.

“(7) The Department shall assure that staff performing the duties are trained and privileged to perform the functions identified in the waiver. The Department shall involve stakeholders including, but not limited to, the North Carolina Psychiatric Association, The North Carolina Nurses Association, National Association of Social Workers, The North Carolina Substance Abuse Professional Practice Board, North Carolina Psychological Association, The North Carolina Society for Clinical Social Work, and the North Carolina Medical Society in developing required staff competencies.

“(8) The LME shall assure that a physician is available at all times to provide backup support to include telephone consultation and face-to-face evaluation, if necessary.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2006’.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2006-2007 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2006-2007 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2006-66, s. 28.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(b), provides: “The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (LOC) shall review the report submitted by the Secretary under Section 1.1.(a) of this act. The LOC shall make recommendations to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly regarding whether to extend the pilot, discontinue the pilot, or make the provisions of the pilot permanent and statewide.”

Session Laws
2018-33, s. 46, made the amendment of this section by Session Laws
2018-33, s. 33, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to proceedings initiated on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-33, s. 33, substituted “commitment examiner” for “physician or eligible psychologist” throughout; in the first paragraph, substituted “the individual” for “him” in the first sentence; in the second paragraph, substituted “the clerk or magistrate shall” for “he shall”; and made minor stylistic and gender neutral changes. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).

§ 122C-283.
Duties of law enforcement officer; first examination by commitment examiner.

Without unnecessary delay after assuming custody, the law enforcement officer or the individual designated or required to provide transportation under G.S. 122C-251(g) shall take the respondent to a facility or other location identified by the LME/MCO in the community crisis services plan adopted pursuant to

G.S. 122C-202.2

that has an available commitment examiner and is capable of performing a first examination in conjunction with a health screening in the same location, unless circumstances indicate the respondent appears to be suffering a medical emergency in which case the law enforcement officer will seek immediate medical assistance for the respondent. If a commitment examiner is not available, whether on-site, on-call, or via telehealth, at any facility or location, or if a plan has not been adopted, the person designated to provide transportation shall take the respondent to an alternative non-hospital provider or facility-based crisis center for a first examination in conjunction with a health screening at the same location. If no non-hospital provider or facility-based crisis center for a first examination in conjunction with a health screening at the same location, the person designated to provide transportations shall take the respondent to a private hospital or clinic, a general hospital, an acute care hospital, or a State facility for individuals with mental illnesses. If a commitment examiner is not immediately available, the respondent may be temporarily detained in an area facility if one is available; if an area facility is not available, the respondent may be detained under appropriate supervision, in the respondent’s home, in a private hospital or a clinic, or in a general hospital, but not in a jail or other penal facility. For the purposes of this section, “non-hospital provider” means an outpatient provider that provides either behavioral health or medical services.

The examination set forth in subsection (a) of this section is not required if:

The affiant who obtained the custody order is a physician or eligible psychologist; or

The respondent is in custody under the special emergency procedure described in

G.S. 122C-282

.

In these cases when it is recommended that the respondent be detained in a 24-hour facility, the law-enforcement officer shall take the respondent directly to a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

.

The commitment examiner described in subsection (a) of this section shall examine the respondent as soon as possible, and in any event within 24 hours, after the respondent is presented for examination. The examination performed by a commitment examiner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be performed either in the physical face-to-face presence of the commitment examiner or utilizing telehealth equipment and procedures. A commitment examiner who examines a respondent by means of telehealth must be satisfied to a reasonable medical certainty that the determinations made in accordance with subsection (d) of this section would not be different if the examination had been conducted in the physical presence of the commitment examiner. A commitment examiner who is not so satisfied shall note that the examination was not satisfactorily accomplished, and the respondent shall be taken for a face-to-face examination in the physical presence of a person authorized to perform examinations under this section. As used in this section, “telehealth” is the use of two-way, real-time interactive audio and video where the respondent and commitment examiner can hear and see each other. A recipient is referred by one provider to receive the services of another provider via telehealth. The examination shall include but is not limited to an assessment of all of the following:

The respondent’s current and previous substance abuse including, if available, previous treatment history.

The respondent’s dangerousness to self or others as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

.

After the conclusion of the examination the physician or eligible psychologist shall make the following determinations:

If the physician or eligible psychologist finds that the respondent is a substance abuser and is dangerous to himself or others, he shall recommend commitment and whether the respondent should be released or be held at a 24-hour facility pending hearing and shall so show on [the] his examination report. Based on the physician’s or eligible psychologist’s recommendation the law-enforcement officer or other designated individual shall take the respondent to a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

or release the respondent.

If the physician or eligible psychologist finds that the condition described in subdivision (1) of this subsection does not exist, the respondent shall be released and the proceedings terminated.

The findings of the physician or eligible psychologist and the facts on which they are based shall be in writing in all cases. A copy of the findings shall be sent to the clerk of superior court by the most reliable and expeditious means. If it cannot be reasonably anticipated that the clerk will receive the copy within 48 hours of the time that it was signed, the physician or eligible psychologist shall also communicate his findings to the clerk by telephone.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 4; c. 679, s. 8; c. 739, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, s. 27; c. 915, s. 4; 1983, c. 380, ss. 4, 10; c. 638, ss. 6, 7, 25.1; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, ss. 2, 9; 2018-33, s. 34; 2018-76, s. 3.2(b); 2019-177, s. 7(b); 2021-77, s. 6(c).

Temporary Waiver of Certain Mental Health Commitment Requirements.

Session Laws
2003-178, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2006-66, s. 10.27, Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(a), Session Laws
2009-340, s. 3, Session Laws
2010-119, s. 1, and Session Laws
2010-123, s. 4.8, effective July 1, 2003, and expiring October 1, 2012, provides: “The Secretary of Health and Human Services may, upon request of an LME, waive temporarily the requirements of

G.S. 122C-261

through

G.S. 122C-263

and

G.S. 122C-281

through

G.S. 122C-283

pertaining to initial (first-level) examinations by a physician or eligible psychologist of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261

(a) or

G.S. 122C-281

(a), as applicable, as follows:

“(1) The Secretary has received a request from an LME to substitute for a physician or eligible psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a masters level psychiatric nurse, or a masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist to conduct the initial (first-level) examinations of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261(a)

or
G.S. 122C-281(a). The waiver shall be implemented on a pilot-program basis. The request from the LME shall specifically describe:

“a. How the purpose of the statutory requirement would be better served by waiving the requirement and substituting the proposed change under the waiver.

“b. How the waiver will enable the LME to improve the delivery or management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“c. How the services to be provided by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under the waiver are within each of these professional’s scope of practice.

“d. How the health, safety, and welfare of individuals will continue to be at least as well protected under the waiver as under the statutory requirement.

“(2) The Secretary shall review the request and may approve it upon finding that:

“a. The request meets the requirements of this section.

“b. The request furthers the purposes of State policy under

G.S. 122C-2

and mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services reform.

“c. The request improves the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in the counties affected by the waiver and also protects the health, safety, and welfare of individuals receiving these services.

“d. The duties and responsibilities performed by the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist are within the individual’s scope of practice.

“(3) The Secretary shall evaluate the effectiveness, quality, and efficiency of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services and protection of health, safety, and welfare under the waiver. The Secretary shall send a report on the evaluation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substances Abuse Services by October 1, 2009. The report shall include data gathered from all participating LMEs since the beginning of the pilot.

“(4) The waiver granted by the Secretary under this section shall be in effect until October 1, 2012.

“(5) The Secretary may grant a waiver under this section to up to 20 LMEs.

“(6) In no event shall the substitution of a licensed clinical social worker, masters level psychiatric nurse, or masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist under a waiver granted under this section be construed as authorization to expand the scope of practice of the licensed clinical social worker, the masters level psychiatric nurse, or the masters level licensed clinical addictions specialist.

“(7) The Department shall assure that staff performing the duties are trained and privileged to perform the functions identified in the waiver. The Department shall involve stakeholders including, but not limited to, the North Carolina Psychiatric Association, The North Carolina Nurses Association, National Association of Social Workers, The North Carolina Substance Abuse Professional Practice Board, North Carolina Psychological Association, The North Carolina Society for Clinical Social Work, and the North Carolina Medical Society in developing required staff competencies.

“(8) The LME shall assure that a physician is available at all times to provide backup support to include telephone consultation and face-to-face evaluation, if necessary.”

Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.1(b), provides: “The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (LOC) shall review the report submitted by the Secretary under Section 1.1.(a) of this act. The LOC shall make recommendations to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly regarding whether to extend the pilot, discontinue the pilot, or make the provisions of the pilot permanent and statewide.”

§ 122C-284.
Duties of clerk of superior court.

Upon receipt by the clerk of superior court of a finding made by a commitment examiner or other qualified professional pursuant to G.S. 122C-285(c) that a respondent is a substance abuser and dangerous to self or others and that commitment is recommended, the clerk of superior court of the county where the facility is located, if the respondent is held in a 24-hour facility, or the clerk of superior court where the petition was initiated shall upon direction of a district court judge assign counsel, calendar the matter for hearing, and notify the respondent, the respondent’s counsel, and the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing. The petitioner or respondent, directly, or through counsel, may file a written waiver of the right to notice under this subsection with the clerk of court.

Notice to the respondent required by subsection (a) of this section shall be given as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) at least 72 hours before the hearing. Notice to other individuals shall be given by mailing at least 72 hours before the hearing a copy by first-class mail postage prepaid to the individual at his or her last known address.

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 6 shall not apply.

Upon receipt of notice that transportation is necessary to take a committed respondent to a 24-hour facility pursuant to

G.S. 122C-290(b)

, the clerk shall issue a custody order for the respondent.

The clerk of superior court shall upon the direction of a district court judge calendar all hearings, supplemental hearings, and rehearings and provide all notices required by this Part.

History.

1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 5; c. 414, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, s. 5; 1983, c. 380, s. 9; c. 638, s. 8; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 10; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 27; 2018-33, s. 35.

§ 122C-285.
Commitment; second examination and treatment pending hearing.

Within 24 hours of arrival at a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

, the respondent shall be examined by a qualified professional. This professional shall be a physician if the initial commitment evaluation was conducted by a commitment examiner who is not a physician. The examination shall include the assessment specified in G.S. 122C-283(c). If the physician or qualified professional finds that the respondent is a substance abuser and is dangerous to self or others, the physician or qualified professional shall hold and treat the respondent at the facility or designate other treatment pending the district court hearing. If the physician or qualified professional finds that the respondent does not meet the criteria for commitment under G.S. 122C-283(d)(1), the physician or qualified professional shall release the respondent and the proceeding shall be terminated. In this case the reasons for the release shall be reported in writing to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the custody order originated. If the respondent is released, the law enforcement officer or other person designated or required under G.S. 122C-251(g) to provide transportation shall return the respondent to the originating county.

(a1)

The second examination of a respondent required by subsection (a) of this section to determine whether the respondent will be involuntarily committed due to substance abuse may be conducted either in the physical face-to-face presence of a physician or utilizing telehealth equipment and procedures, provided that the physician who examines the respondent by means of telehealth is satisfied to a reasonable medical certainty that the determinations made in accordance with subsection (a) of this section would not be different if the examination had been done in the physical presence of the commitment examiner. An examining physician who is not so satisfied shall note that the examination was not satisfactorily accomplished, and the respondent shall be taken for a face-to-face examination in the physical presence of a qualified professional; provided, however, that if the initial commitment examination was performed by a qualified professional, then this face-to-face examination shall be in the presence of a physician. As used in this section, “telehealth” means the use of two-way, real-time interactive audio and video where the respondent and commitment examiner can hear and see each other.

If the 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

is the facility in which the first examination by a commitment examiner occurred and is the same facility in which the respondent is held, the second examination must occur not later than the following regular working day.

The findings of the physician or qualified professional along with a summary of the facts on which they are based shall be made in writing in all cases. A copy of the written findings shall be sent to the clerk of superior court by reliable and expeditious means.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 6; 1979, c. 915, s. 6; 1983, c. 380, s. 5; c. 638, ss. 9, 10; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 11; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 28; 2018-33, s. 36; 2021-77, s. 6(d).

§ 122C-286.
Commitment; district court hearing.

A hearing shall be held in district court within 10 days of the day the respondent is taken into custody. If a respondent temporarily detained under G.S. 122C-263(d)(2) is subject to a series of successive custody orders issued pursuant to G.S. 122C-263(d)(2), the hearing shall be held within 10 days after the day the respondent is taken into custody under the most recent custody order. Upon its own motion or upon motion of the responsible professional, the respondent, or the State, the court may grant a continuance of not more than five days.

The respondent shall be present at the hearing unless the respondent, through counsel, submits a written waiver of personal appearance. A subpoena may be issued to compel the respondent’s presence at a hearing. The petitioner and the responsible professional of the area facility or the proposed treating physician or a designee of the proposed treating physician may be present and may provide testimony.

Certified copies of reports and findings of physicians, psychologists, and other commitment examiners and medical records of previous and current treatment are admissible in evidence, but the respondent’s right to confront and cross-examine witnesses shall not be denied.

The respondent may be represented by counsel of choice. If the respondent is indigent within the meaning of

G.S. 7A-450

, counsel shall be appointed to represent the respondent in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

Hearings may be held at a facility if it is located within the judge’s district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

or in the judge’s chambers. A hearing may not be held in a regular courtroom, over objection of the respondent, if in the discretion of a judge a more suitable place is available.

The hearing shall be closed to the public unless the respondent requests otherwise. The hearing for a respondent being held at a 24-hour facility shall be held in a location and in the manner provided in G.S. 122C-268(g).

A copy of all documents admitted into evidence and a transcript of the proceedings shall be furnished to the respondent on request by the clerk upon the direction of a district court judge. If the respondent is indigent, the copies shall be provided at State expense.

To support a commitment order, the court shall find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-283(d)(1). The court shall record the facts that support its findings and shall show on the order the area facility or physician who is responsible for the management and supervision of the respondent’s treatment.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 8; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, ss. 29, 30; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 117; 2000-144, s. 43; 2018-33, s. 37.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

§ 122C-286.1.
Venue of district court hearing when respondent held at a 24-hour facility pending hearing.

In all cases where the respondent is held at a 24-hour facility pending the district court hearing as provided in

G.S. 122C-286

, unless the respondent through counsel objects to the venue, the hearing shall be held in the county in which the facility is located. Upon objection to venue, the hearing shall be held in the county where the petition was initiated.

An official of the facility shall immediately notify the clerk of superior court of the county in which the facility is located of a determination to hold the respondent pending hearing. That clerk shall request transmittal of all documents pertinent to the proceedings from the clerk of superior court where the proceedings were initiated. The requesting clerk shall assume all duties set forth in

G.S. 122C-284

. The counsel provided for in G.S. 122C-286(d) shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 31; 2000-144, s. 44.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

§ 122C-287.
Disposition.

The court may make one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent is a substance abuser and is dangerous to self or others, it shall order for a period not in excess of 180 days commitment to and treatment by an area facility or physician who is responsible for the management and supervision of the respondent’s commitment and treatment. Before ordering commitment to and treatment by an area facility or a physician who is not a physician at an inpatient facility, the court shall follow the procedures specified in G.S. 122C-271(a)(3) and G.S. 122C-271(b)(4), as applicable.

If the court finds that the respondent does not meet the commitment criteria set out in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the respondent shall be discharged and the facility in which he was last treated so notified.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 8; c. 739, s. 2; 1979, c. 358, s. 26; c. 915, ss. 8, 15, 16; 1981, c. 537, s. 1; 1983, c. 380, s. 8; c. 638, s. 14; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 38.

§ 122C-288.
Appeal.

Judgment of the district court is final. Appeal may be had to the Court of Appeals by the State or by any party on the record as in civil cases. Appeal does not stay the commitment unless so ordered by the Court of Appeals. The Attorney General shall represent the State’s interest on appeal. The district court retains limited jurisdiction for the purpose of hearing all reviews, rehearings, or supplemental hearings allowed or required under this Part.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 law on civil procedure, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1049 (1981).

§ 122C-289.
Duty of assigned counsel; discharge.

If the respondent is committed, assigned counsel remains responsible for the respondent’s representation at the trial level until discharged by order of district court or until the respondent is otherwise unconditionally discharged. If the respondent appeals, counsel for the appeal shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2006-264, s. 61(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 61(b), effective October 1, 2006, and applicable to appeals filed on or after that date, rewrote the section.

§ 122C-290.
Duties for follow-up on commitment order.

The area facility or physician responsible for management and supervision of the respondent’s commitment and treatment may prescribe or administer to the respondent reasonable and appropriate treatment either on an outpatient basis or in a 24-hour facility.

If the respondent whose treatment is provided on an outpatient basis fails to comply with all or part of the prescribed treatment after reasonable effort to solicit the respondent’s compliance or whose treatment is provided on an inpatient basis is discharged in accordance with G.S. 122C-205.1(b), the area facility or physician may request the clerk or magistrate to order the respondent taken into custody for the purpose of examination. Upon receipt of this request, the clerk or magistrate shall issue an order to a law enforcement officer to take the respondent into custody and to take him immediately to the designated area facility or physician for examination. The custody order is valid throughout the State. The law enforcement officer shall turn the respondent over to the custody of the physician or area facility who shall conduct the examination and release the respondent or have the respondent taken to a 24-hour facility upon a determination that treatment in the facility will benefit the respondent. Transportation to the 24-hour facility shall be provided as specified in

G.S. 122C-251

, upon notice to the clerk or magistrate that transportation is necessary, or as provided in

G.S. 122C-408(b)

. If placement in a 24-hour facility is to exceed 45 consecutive days, the area facility or physician shall notify the clerk of court by the 30th day and request a supplemental hearing as specified in

G.S. 122C-291

.

If the respondent intends to move or moves to another county within the State, the area facility or physician shall notify the clerk of court in the county where the commitment is being supervised and request that a supplemental hearing be calendared.

If the respondent moves to another state or to an unknown location, the designated area facility or physician shall notify the clerk of superior court of the county where the commitment is supervised and the commitment shall be terminated.

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 16; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 32; 1987, c. 674, s. 2; c. 750; 2004-23, s. 2(c); 2018-33, s. 39.

§ 122C-291.
Supplemental hearings.

Upon receipt of a request for a supplemental hearing, the clerk shall calendar a hearing to be held within 14 days and notify, at least 72 hours before the hearing, the petitioner, the respondent, his attorney, if any, and the designated area facility or physician. Notice shall be provided in accordance with G.S. 122C-284(b). The procedures for the hearing shall follow

G.S. 122C-286

.

At the supplemental hearing for a respondent who has moved or may move to another county, the court shall determine if the respondent meets the criteria for commitment set out in G.S. 122C-283(d)(1). If the court determines that the respondent no longer meets the criteria for commitment, it shall discharge the respondent from the order and dismiss the case. If the court determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria for commitment, it shall continue the commitment but shall designate an area facility or physician at the respondent’s new residence to be responsible for the management or supervision of the respondent’s commitment. The court shall order the respondent to appear for treatment at the address of the newly designated area facility or physician and shall order venue for further court proceedings under the commitment to be transferred to the new county of supervision. Upon an order changing venue, the clerk of court in the county where the commitment has been supervised shall transfer the records regarding the commitment to the clerk of court in the county where the commitment will be supervised. Also, the clerk of court in the county where the commitment has been supervised shall send a copy of the court’s order directing the continuation of treatment under new supervision to the newly designated area facility or physician.

At a supplemental hearing for a respondent to be held longer than 45 consecutive days in a 24-hour facility, the court shall determine if the respondent meets the criteria for commitment set out in G.S. 122C-283(d)(1). If the court determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria and that further treatment in the 24-hour facility is necessary, the court may authorize continued care in the facility for not more than 90 days, after which a rehearing for the purpose of determining the need for continued care in the 24-hour facility shall be held, or the court may order the respondent released from the 24-hour facility and continued on the commitment on an outpatient basis. If the court determines that the respondent no longer meets the criteria for commitment the respondent shall be released and his case dismissed.

At any time during the term of commitment order, a respondent may apply to the court for a supplemental hearing for the purpose of discharge from the order. The application shall be made in writing to the clerk of superior court. At the supplemental hearing the court shall determine whether the respondent continues to meet the criteria for commitment. The court may reissue or change the commitment order or discharge the respondent and dismiss the case.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 40.

§ 122C-292.
Rehearings.

Fifteen days before the end of the initial or subsequent periods of commitment if the area facility or physician determines that the respondent continues to meet the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-283(d)(1), the clerk of superior court of the county where commitment is supervised shall be notified. The clerk, at least 10 days before the end of the commitment period, on order of the district court, shall calendar the rehearing. If the respondent no longer meets the criteria, the area facility or physician shall so notify the clerk who shall dismiss the case.

Rehearings are governed by the same notice and procedures as initial hearings, and the respondent has the same rights that were available to the respondent at the initial hearing including the right to appeal.

If the court finds that the respondent no longer meets the criteria of G.S. 122C-283(d)(1), it shall unconditionally discharge him. A copy of the discharge order shall be furnished by the clerk to the designated area facility or physician. If the respondent continues to meet the criteria of G.S. 122C-283(d)(1), the court may order commitment for additional periods not in excess of 365 days each.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 9; 1979, c. 915, ss. 9, 17; 1981, c. 537, ss. 2-4; 1983, c. 638, ss. 18-19; 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 41.

§ 122C-293.
Release by area facility or physician.

The area facility or physician as designated in the order shall discharge a committed respondent unconditionally at any time the physician determines that the respondent no longer meets the criteria of G.S. 122C-283(d)(1). Notice of discharge and the reasons for the release shall be reported in writing to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the commitment was ordered.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1981, c. 537, s. 5; 1983, c. 383, s. 6; c. 638, s. 21; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 42.

§ 122C-294.
Local plan and data submission.

The “local area crisis services plans” adopted in accordance with

G.S. 122C-202.2

and G.S. 122C-251(g) shall be submitted to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services beginning October 1, 2019, but no later than August 1, 2020. If the area authority modifies any plan, the modified plan shall be submitted to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the new plan.

The Department shall provide the data collected by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services concerning the number of respondents receiving treatment under involuntary commitment in designated facilities to the Fiscal Research Division and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee for Health and Human Services on October 1 of each year beginning in 2019 and any other time upon request.

History.

1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 679, s. 8; 1979, c. 358, ss. 26, 27; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 43; 2019-240, s. 26(i).

§§ 122C-295 through 122C-300.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 9. Public Intoxication.